Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 5
POWERS AND PURPOSES: APPLICATION OF OTHER LAWS

7-56-501. Powers.

Every cooperative has the power, except as specifically limited by this article or by its own articles or bylaws:

To have perpetual existence and succession by its domestic entity name unless limited by the articles;

To sue and be sued and to complain and defend in courts of law and equity;

To make and use a common seal, alter the same at its pleasure, and to use such seal or a facsimile thereof, including a rubber stamp, by impressing or affixing it or by reproducing it in any other manner;

To purchase, receive, lease, and otherwise acquire, and to own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal with, real or personal property or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

To purchase, receive, subscribe for, and otherwise acquire shares and other interests in, and obligations of, any other entity, including any other cooperative, and to own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, and otherwise dispose of, and deal in and with, the same;

To make contracts and guarantees; incur liabilities; borrow money; issue notes, bonds, and other obligations, which may be convertible into or include the option to purchase other securities of the cooperative; and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises, or income;

To lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

To be a partner, member, associate, trustee, promoter, or manager of, or to hold any similar position with, any entity;

To conduct its business, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by this article within or outside this state;

To elect directors and officers and appoint employees and agents of the cooperative, define their duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money and credit;

To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans, share bonus plans, share options and rights plans, and benefit or incentive plans for any or all of its current or former directors, officers, employees, and agents;

To make payments or donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;

To regulate and limit the right of members to transfer their memberships, stock, or other equity;

To make and amend its articles and bylaws for the management of its affairs and to make provisions in its articles for the terms and limitations of stock ownership or membership and for the distribution of its earnings;

To indemnify its directors, officers, employees, and agents to the extent provided or permitted in this article and to eliminate or limit the personal liability of a director, officers, employees, or agents of the cooperative, as provided in accordance with section 7-56-406; however, no such provision shall eliminate or limit the liability of a director or officer to the association or to its members for monetary damages for any act or omission occurring prior to the effective date of such provision;

To establish in its bylaws procedures for the disposition of funds when declared payable by the cooperative and unclaimed by the holder three years after notification has been mailed to the holder's last-known address of record on the books of the cooperative, which disposition may consist of transferring the funds to the general operating account of the cooperative;

To establish, secure, own, and develop patents, trademarks, and copyrights;

To make advance payments and advances to members;

To act as the agent or representative of any member for any lawful purpose or in any lawful transaction of the cooperative;

To purchase or otherwise acquire and to hold, own, and exercise all rights of ownership in, and to sell, transfer, or pledge or guarantee the payment of dividends or interest on, or the retirement or redemption of shares of the stock or bonds of any person engaged in any lawful activity;

To allocate earnings and pay patronage dividends;

To use per unit retains;

To prohibit or place limitations on amounts or rates of dividends payable on any class of capital stock or other equity investment in the cooperative;

To engage in any activity in connection with the purchase, hiring, or use by its members or other patrons of goods, services, products, equipment, supplies, utilities, telecommunications, housing, or health care;

To establish amounts for reasonable and necessary reserves for bad debts, obsolescence, grain, quality and grade, contingent losses, working capital, debt retirement, buildings and equipment, and ownership retirement and to provide that no member or other person entitled to share in the allocation of the cooperative's net margins or other funds shall have any rights except upon dissolution when the entire reserve funds of the cooperative shall be distributed in accordance with applicable federal, state, and local law and the articles and bylaws of the cooperative;

To manufacture, sell, or supply goods, machinery, equipment, supplies, or services to its members and to other patrons or persons;

(aa.5) To adopt a trade name;

To finance one or more of the activities in this section; and

To perform every other form or type of act that is necessary or proper for accomplishing any lawful purpose of the cooperative not prohibited to it by law or its articles and bylaws or that is conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the cooperative.

In addition to the powers granted in subsection (1) of this section, each agricultural cooperative incorporated under this article has the following powers:

To engage in any activity in connection with the marketing, selling, preserving, raising, harvesting, drying, processing, manufacturing, canning, packing, grading, storing, handling, and utilization of any products, by-products, or services produced or delivered to the cooperative by its members or other patrons;

To engage in any activity in connection with agricultural education and research and to represent its members' interests in legislative and administrative forums.

In addition to the powers specifically given in this article, a cooperative has all powers, rights, and privileges granted by the law of this state to domestic corporations or domestic nonprofit corporations that are not inconsistent with the provisions of this article.

The powers enumerated in this article shall vest in every cooperative in this state formed under this article, or that has elected to be subject to this article, although they may not be stated in its charter or in its articles.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 507, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(aa.5) added, p. 612, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 951, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 2228, § 88, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-107 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-502. Marketing or purchasing contracts.

Cooperatives limiting membership to agricultural producers may make and execute marketing or purchasing contracts requiring the members to sell or purchase, for any period of time not over ten years, all or any specified part of their agricultural products or specified commodities, goods, services, or input supplies exclusively to or through the cooperative or any facilities utilized or to be created by the cooperative. If such producers contract to sell to the cooperative, it shall be conclusively held that title to the products passes absolutely and unreservedly, except for recorded liens, to the cooperative upon delivery or at any other specified time if expressly and definitely agreed to in the contract. The contract may provide, among other things, that the cooperative may sell or resell the products delivered by its members with or without taking title to the products and pay over to its members the resale price, after deducting all necessary selling, overhead, and other costs and expenses, including interest or dividends on stock which shall not exceed eight percent per annum, and reserves for proper purposes.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 510, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-119 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-503. Remedies for breach of marketing or purchasing contract.

The bylaws or the marketing or purchasing contracts of an agricultural cooperative may fix as liquidated damages specific sums to be paid by a member to the cooperative upon the breach by the member of any provision of the marketing or purchasing contract regarding the sale, purchase, receipt, or delivery or withholding of products or other goods and may further provide that the member will pay all costs, premiums for bonds, expenses, and fees if any action is brought upon the contract by the cooperative. All such provisions shall be valid and enforceable in the courts of this state, and clauses providing for liquidated damages shall be enforceable as such and shall not be regarded as penalties.

In the event of any breach or threatened breach of a marketing or purchasing contract by a member, the cooperative shall be entitled to an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract and to a decree of specific performance of the contract. Pending the adjudication of the action and upon filing a sufficient bond and verified complaint showing the breach or threatened breach, the cooperative shall be entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the member.

In any action upon a marketing contract, it shall be conclusively presumed that a landowner, landlord, or lessor is able to control the delivery of products or other goods produced on such landowner's, landlord's, or lessor's land by tenants or others whose tenancy or possession or work on such land or the terms of whose tenancy or possession or labor on such land was created or changed after execution by the landowner, landlord, or lessor of such marketing contract. The remedies provided in this section for nondelivery or breach shall lie and be enforceable against such landowner, landlord, or lessor in any such action upon a marketing contract.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 510, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-120 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-504. Inducing breach of marketing or purchasing contract.

Any person who knowingly induces any member of an agricultural cooperative formed under this article, or under similar statutes of another jurisdiction with similar restrictions and rights and operating in this state, to break the member's marketing or purchasing contract or agreement with the cooperative shall be subject to all available civil remedies, including but not limited to injunctive relief.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 511, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2228, § 89, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1414, § 51, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-128 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-505. Purchases of property or other interests.

If a cooperative with preferred stock or preferred equity purchases or otherwise acquires any interest in any property, stock, or interest in another entity, it may, with the consent of the person or persons from whom the property or interests are being acquired, discharge the obligations incurred in the purchase or other acquisition, wholly or in part, by exchanging for the acquired property, stock, or interest shares or amounts of its preferred stock or preferred equity in an amount that, at par or stated value, would equal the value of the property, stock, or interest so purchased, as determined by the board. A transfer to the cooperative of the property, stock, or interest purchased or otherwise acquired shall be equivalent to payment in cash for the shares or amounts of preferred stock or preferred equity issued by the cooperative.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 511, § 1, effective July 1.

7-56-506. Warehouse receipts - interest in warehouse entities.

If a cooperative formed under or that has elected to be subject to this article organizes, forms, operates, owns, controls, has an interest in, owns stock of, or is a member of any commodities warehouse, the warehouse may issue legal warehouse receipts to the cooperative against the commodities delivered by it or to any other person, and any legal warehouse receipt shall be considered as adequate collateral to the extent of the usual and current value of the commodity represented by the receipt. If the warehouse is licensed or licensed and bonded under the law of this state, any other state, or the United States, its warehouse receipt delivered to the cooperative on commodities of the cooperative or its members or delivered by the cooperative or its members shall not be challenged or discriminated against because of ownership or control, wholly or in part, by the cooperative.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 511, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2228, § 90, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-125 as existed prior to 1996.

Cross references:

For other duties and liabilities of warehouses, see article 7 of title 4 and part 2 of article 36 of title 35.

7-56-507. Application of other laws.

If a matter is not addressed in this article, the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of this title, shall apply to the cooperatives formed under or subject to this article; except that a cooperative may elect to have the provisions of the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of this title, apply to it if such cooperative does so in its articles or by a resolution of its members that is delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title that states that the cooperative elects to have the provisions of the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of this title, apply to it. A cooperative may revoke such election by amending its articles or by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of change that states that the cooperative revokes its election to have the provisions of the "Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act", articles 121 to 137 of this title, apply to it and that the revocation of such election has been approved by resolution of its members.

Any exemptions under any existing law applying to goods or agricultural products in the possession or under the control of an individual producer shall apply similarly and completely to such goods or products when delivered by its members to, and in the possession or under the control of, the cooperative.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 511, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 760, § 22, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1818, § 24, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1682, § 22, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2228, § 91, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-55-116 and 7-56-130 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-508. Cooperatives not in restraint of trade.

No cooperative formed under or subject to this article shall solely by its organization and existence be deemed to be a conspiracy or a combination in restraint of trade, an illegal monopoly, or an attempt to lessen competition or to fix prices arbitrarily, nor shall the marketing or purchasing contracts and agreements between any cooperative and its members or any agreements authorized in this article be considered illegal as such, in unlawful restraint of trade, or as part of a conspiracy or combination to accomplish an improper or illegal purpose.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 512, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2229, § 92, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-56-129 as it existed prior to 1996.

7-56-509. Exemption from securities laws.

Any security, patronage refund, per unit retain certificate, capital credit, evidence of membership, preferred equity certificate, or other equity instrument issued, sold, or reported by a cooperative as an investment in its stock or capital to the patrons of a cooperative formed under or subject to this article or a similar law of any other jurisdiction and authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state is exempt from the securities laws contained in the "Colorado Securities Act", article 51 of title 11, C.R.S. Such securities, patronage refunds, per unit retain certificates, capital credits, or evidences of membership, preferred equity certificates or other equity instruments may be issued, sold, or reported lawfully by the issuer or its directors, officers, members, or salaried employees without the necessity of the issuer or its directors, officers, members, or employees being registered as brokers or dealers under the "Colorado Securities Act", article 51 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 512, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2229, § 93, effective July 1, 2004.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-55-115 as it existed in 1996.

7-56-510. Renewable energy cooperatives - powers.

In addition to the powers granted in this article, renewable energy cooperatives may generate electricity from renewable resources or technologies and transmit and sell electricity at wholesale.

No renewable energy cooperative shall sell electricity at retail or have a certificated territory in the state except as allowed for its own service or pursuant to public utility law or other legal authority.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1122, § 2, effective May 27.